District of Columbia statutes.
47-1364

Assessment during redemption period; assessment to purchaser.

Until a judgment is entered that forecloses the right of redemption in a real property sold by the Mayor and a deed is executed by the Mayor, the real property shall continue to be assessed as though no sale had been made. When the judgment is entered and the deed executed, the real property shall be transferred on the assessment books or records to the purchaser notwithstanding any other law. After the transfer, the real property shall be assessed in the name of the purchaser.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).